Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-256
School and federal lands; exchange; minimum appraised value.

The appraised value of any state lands exchanged under sections 72-253 to 72-255 shall not be less than seven dollars per acre, and the appraised value of the United States land received therefor shall correspond to this requirement.

Laws 1917, c. 212, § 4, p. 520;

C.S.1922, § 5214;

C.S.1929, § 72-234;

R.S.1943, § 72-256.